Tennessee, session 114, SB2436.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-7-1001(b), is amended by
deleting "Unless otherwise required by a national accrediting body," and substituting "Except as
provided in subsection (j), and unless otherwise required by a national accrediting body,".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-7-1001(f)(2)(C), is amended by
deleting "A health insurance entity shall" and substituting "Except as provided in subsection (j),
a health insurance entity shall".
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-7-1001, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(j) Notwithstanding this section to the contrary, a health insurance entity shall
complete an application for credentialing within two (2) weeks of receipt of a complete
application from a healthcare provider, if:
(1) The healthcare provider relocates to a new healthcare practice group
or healthcare facility;
(2) The healthcare provider was credentialed at the healthcare provider's
immediately previous practice group or facility; and
(3) The new practice group or facility is credentialed by the health
insurance entity.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to applications for credentialing initiated on or after that date.
SB2436
012447
- 1 -